Utah statutes.
4-3-13.   Milk or milk products consumed by owner of farm exempt.

This chapter is inapplicable to milk or milk products produced on the farm if such milk or milk products are consumed by the owner of the farm or members of such owner's immediate family.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1979 General Session

